Louisiana, session 2026, SB222.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 2 of Title 28 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised
of R.S. 28:301 through 308, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 2. MEDICAID BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE
REQUIREMENTS
§301. Legislative findings and purpose
A. The Legislature finds that administrative duplication, workforce
shortages, and regulatory inconsistencies reduce access to behavioral health
services in Louisiana.
B. The purpose of this Chapter is to eliminate unnecessary
administrative barriers, align behavioral health program requirements with
federal standards and licensing board supervision requirements, and expand
workforce flexibility while maintaining patient safety and quality of care.
§302. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Cardiopulmonary resuscitation" or "CPR" means an emergency
procedure combining chest compressions and breaths to maintain blood flow
and oxygenation during cardiac arrest.
(2) "Community psychiatric support and treatment services" or "CPST"
services, means CMS-approved Medicaid mental health rehabilitation services
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 222 ENROLLED
designed to reduce disability from mental illness, restore functional skills of
daily living, build natural supports, and achieve identified person-centered
goals or objectives through counseling, clinical psycho-education, and ongoing
monitoring needs as set forth in an individualized treatment plan.
(3) "CMS" means the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(4) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
(5) "Psychosocial rehabilitation services" or "PSR" services, means
CMS-approved Medicaid mental health rehabilitation services designed to assist
the individual with compensating for or eliminating functional deficits and
interpersonal or environmental barriers associated with mental illness through
skill building and supportive interventions to restore and rehabilitate social and
interpersonal skills and daily living skills.
§303. Pre-employment reference letters; prohibition
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law or administrative rule to the
contrary, the Louisiana Department of Health and any managed care entity
administering Medicaid behavioral health services shall not require
pre-employment reference letters as a condition of provider enrollment, staff
credentialing, or the delivery of Medicaid behavioral health services.
B. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit verification of employment
history, licensure status, education, or required work experience through
primary source verification.
§304. CPR, first aid, and seizure assessment training; approved programs
A. The Louisiana Department of Health and any managed care entity
administering Medicaid behavioral health services shall not require CPR, first
aid certification, or seizure assessment training for behavioral health staff as a
condition of provider enrollment, staff credentialing, or reimbursement, except
as provided in Subsection B of this Section.
B. The department may require CPR, first aid certification, or seizure
assessment training only for staff who provide services in settings where such
training is required by federal law, state law, or applicable licensing
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 222 ENROLLED
requirements for a residential facility, inpatient facility, or medication
administration program.
§305. Supervision of licensed staff; alignment
A. For purposes of Medicaid behavioral health programs administered
by the Louisiana Department of Health, supervision required for staff who are
provisionally licensed or otherwise under supervision pursuant to the
requirements of a Louisiana licensing board shall be deemed to satisfy clinical
supervision requirements when such supervision meets or exceeds applicable
program standards.
B. The department shall not require duplicative supervision for the same
staff member when supervision required by the relevant licensing board
overlaps with program requirements.
§306. Documentation timeliness; CMS alignment; exceptions
A. The Louisiana Department of Health shall revise Medicaid behavioral
health provider progress note documentation requirements for CPST and PSR
services to align with federal guidance stating that documentation shall be
completed during the service or as soon as practicable after the service is
provided.
B. The department may establish a general progress note documentation
timeliness standard. However, reasonable exceptions shall be permitted,
including but not limited to a state or federal declared emergency or any other
exception as defined by the department.
C. When documentation is completed outside the general standard, the
provider shall include a late-entry attestation stating the date of entry and the
reason for the delay.
§307. Nursing requirement; provider equivalency
A. When a Medicaid behavioral health provider of CPST or PSR
services is required by rule to maintain a nurse on staff or to maintain a written
agreement for nursing services solely for the purpose of medication
administration, such requirement shall be satisfied by the presence of a licensed
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 222 ENROLLED
physician, psychiatrist, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician
assistant whose duties shall include medication administration.
B. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize any individual
to perform acts outside the scope of professional licensure.
§308. Medical director; inclusion of physician assistants
A. A medical director for a Medical behavioral health provider of CPST
or PSR services may be any of the following:
(1) A physician.
(2) An advanced practice registered nurse.
(3) A medical psychologist.
(4) A physician assistant.
B. Any healthcare provider serving as medical director pursuant to this
Section shall satisfy all of the following criteria:
(1) Have a current, unrestricted license to practice in this state.
(2) Have a minimum of two years of qualifying experience in treating
psychiatric disorders.
(3) Be practicing pursuant to a collaborative practice agreement or
supervision arrangement as required by state law.
C. The Louisiana Department of Health shall revise all applicable rules
and provider manuals to reflect the eligibility provided for in this Section.
Section 2. The Louisiana Department of Health shall promulgate rules in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to implement the provisions of this
Chapter.
Section 3.(A) The Louisiana Department of Health shall submit to the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services, no later than October 1, 2026, any necessary state plan
amendment, waiver, or other request to authorize reimbursement for psychosocial
rehabilitation services delivered via telehealth.
(B) No later than thirty days after submission to the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services, the department shall provide written notice to the House Committee on
Health and Welfare and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare.
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 222 ENROLLED
(C) If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services requests additional
information or denies the submission, the department shall report such request or denial to
the committees within thirty days of the submission.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.